Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1522
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act is to regulate unfair trade practices in the business of insurance, in accordance with the intent of the Congress of the United States as expressed in Public Law 79-15, by defining, or providing for the determination of, all acts and practices in this state which constitute unfair trade practices and by prohibiting the acts and practices so defined or determined.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 4.

Sections of Nebraska Unfair Competition Act and Trade Practices Act governing insurance business do not contemplate private suits but only suits by State Director of Insurance. Allied Financial Services, Inc. v. Foremost Ins. Co., 418 F.Supp. 157 (D. Neb. 1976).